lt-LT: Įtrauktos mokomųjų kortelių funkcijos: Atsakymas kitoje pusėje; Papildyta realybė / susieta programėlė; Nešiojimo maišelis; Sausai valomas žymeklis; Iliustracijos / paveikslėliai; Fonetikos vadovas; Pažangos stebėjimo priemonė; QR kodas / garso priedas; Daugkartinė daiktadėžė; Surišta žiedais; Savarankiško tikrinimo; Žodžių iš matymo sakiniai; Rūšiavimo skirtukai; Mokytojo / tėvų vadovas; Kita
da: Inkluderede Flash-kort funktioner: Svar på bagsiden; Augmented reality/app-ledsager; Opbevaringspose; Whiteboard-marker; Illustrationer/billeder; Lydguide; Fremskridtsmåler; QR-kode/lydledsager; Genanvendelig opbevaringsæske; Ringbundet; Selvkorrigerende; Sætninger med hyppige ord; Sorteringsfaner; Lærer-/forældreguide; Andet
nl: Flashcard meegeleverde kenmerken: Antwoord op de achterkant; Augmented reality/app-companion; Draagtasje; Whiteboardmarker; Illustraties/afbeeldingen; Klankengids; Voortgangstracker; QR-code/audio-companion; Herbruikbare opbergdoos; Ringband; Zelfcorrigerend; Zinnen met zichtwoorden; Sorteertabbladen; Docenten-/oudergids; Overige
hr-HR: Značajke uključene u flash kartice: Odgovor na poleđini; Proširena stvarnost / prateća aplikacija; Torbica za nošenje; Flomaster za suho brisanje; Ilustracije / slike; Vodič za fonetiku; Praćenje napretka; QR kod / prateći zvučni zapis; Kutija za pohranu; Uvezano prstenom; Samoprovjera; Rečenice s čestim riječima; Kartice za razvrstavanje; Vodič za nastavnike i roditelje; Ostalo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά που περιλαμβάνει η κάρτα flash: Απάντηση στο πίσω μέρος; Επαυξημένη πραγματικότητα/συνοδευτική εφαρμογή; Τσαντάκι μεταφοράς; Μαρκαδόρος λευκοπίνακα; Εικονογραφήσεις/εικόνες; Οδηγός φωνητικής; Παρακολούθηση προόδου; Κωδικός QR/συνοδευτικό ήχου; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο κουτί αποθήκευσης; Δεμένο με κρίκο; Αυτοελέγχου; Προτάσεις με λέξεις οπτικής αναγνώρισης; Καρτέλες ταξινόμησης; Οδηγός για δασκάλους/γονείς; Άλλο
it: Caratteristiche incluse della scheda flash: Risposta sul retro; Realtà aumentata/app complementare; Custodia per il trasporto; Pennarello cancellabile a secco; Illustrazioni/immagini; Guida alla fonetica; Monitoraggio dei progressi; Codice QR/audio complementare; Scatola riutilizzabile; Rilegatura ad anelli; Autocorrezione; Frasi con parole ad alta frequenza (sight word); Schede di classificazione; Guida per insegnanti/genitori; Altro
bg-BG: Включени функции на флаш картата: Отговор на гърба; Разширена реалност / придружаващо приложение; Торбичка за пренасяне; Маркер за сухо триене; Илюстрации / снимки; Ръководство по фонетика; Инструмент за проследяване на напредъка; QR код / придружаващо аудио; Кутия за съхранение за многократна употреба; Подвързани с ринг; Самопроверка; Изречения с често срещани думи; Разделители за сортиране; Ръководство за учители / родители; Друго
nb: Funksjoner inkludert i flash-kort: Svar på baksiden; Utvidet virkelighet / tilhørende app; Bæreveske; Whiteboard-tusj; Illustrasjoner / bilder; Lydguide; Fremdriftssporer; QR-kode / tilhørende lyd; Gjenbrukbar oppbevaringsboks; Innbundet med ringer; Selvrettende; Setninger med høyfrekvente ord; Sorteringsfaner; Lærer- / foreldreguide; Annet
fr: Fonctionnalités incluses avec les cartes d’apprentissage: Réponse au dos; Réalité augmentée/application associée; Pochette de transport; Marqueur effaçable à sec; Illustrations/images; Guide phonétique; Suivi des progrès; Code QR/compagnon audio; Boîte de rangement réutilisable; Reliure à anneaux; Auto-correction; Phrases de mots courants; Onglets de tri; Guide pour enseignant/parent; Autre
en: Flash card included features: Answer on back; Augmented reality/app companion; Carry pouch; Dry-erase marker; Illustrations/pictures; Phonics guide; Progress tracker; QR code/audio companion; Reusable storage box; Ring-bound; Self-checking; Sight word sentences; Sorting tabs; Teacher/parent guide; Other
sv: Blixtkort – funktioner: Svar på baksidan; Förstärkt verklighet/app-tillägg; Förvaringspåse; Whiteboardpenna; Illustrationer/bilder; Ljudningsguide; Framstegsmätare; QR-kod/ljudtillägg; Återanvändbar förvaringslåda; Ringbunden; Självrättande; Meningar med ordbilder; Sorteringsflikar; Lärar-/föräldraguide; Övrigt
cs: Prvky výukových karet: Odpověď na zadní straně; Rozšířená realita / propojení s aplikací; Kapsa na přenášení; Smazatelný popisovač; Ilustrace/obrázky; Příručka fonetiky; Sledování pokroku; QR kód / propojení se zvukem; Znovupoužitelný úložný box; Kroužková vazba; Samoopravné; Věty se zrakovými slovy; Třídicí záložky; Průvodce pro učitele/rodiče; Jiné
fi: Flash-korttien ominaisuudet: Vastaus kääntöpuolella; Lisätty todellisuus / tukisovellus; Säilytyspussi; Pyyhittävä tussi; Kuvitukset/kuvat; Ääntämisopas; Edistymisen seuranta; QR-koodi / äänisisältö; Uudelleenkäytettävä säilytyslaatikko; Rengassidottu; Itsetarkistettava; Näkösanalauseet; Lajitteluvälilehdet; Opettajan/vanhemman opas; Muu
sl-SI: Vključene lastnosti učnih kartic: Odgovor na hrbtni strani; Nadgrajena resničnost/spremljevalna aplikacija; Vrečka za prenašanje; Marker za suho brisanje; Ilustracije/slike; Vodnik po fonetiki; Sledilnik napredka; Koda QR/zvočni spremljevalec; Škatla za shranjevanje za večkratno uporabo; Vezano z obročki; Samopreverjanje; Stavki s pogostimi besedami; Zavihki za razvrščanje; Vodnik za učitelje/starše; Drugo
es: Características incluidas en la tarjeta de memoria: Respuesta en el reverso; Realidad aumentada/aplicación complementaria; Bolsa de transporte; Marcador de borrado en seco; Ilustraciones/imágenes; Guía de fonética; Control de progreso; Código QR/audio complementario; Caja de almacenamiento reutilizable; Encuadernación con anillas; Autocorrección; Oraciones con palabras de uso frecuente; Pestañas de clasificación; Guía para profesores/padres; Otro
ro-RO: Caracteristicile incluse ale cardului de memorie: Răspuns pe spate; Realitate augmentată/aplicație însoțitoare; Săculeț de transport; Marker care se șterge uscat; Ilustrații/imagini; Ghid de fonetică; Instrument de urmărire a progresului; Cod QR/însoțitor audio; Cutie de depozitare reutilizabilă; Legat cu inele; Autoverificare; Propoziții cu cuvinte frecvente; File de sortare; Ghid pentru profesor/părinte; Altele
pt-PT: Características incluídas no cartão de memória: Resposta no verso; Realidade aumentada/aplicação complementar; Bolsa de transporte; Marcador de limpeza a seco; Ilustrações/imagens; Guia de fonética; Monitor de progresso; Código QR/áudio complementar; Caixa de arrumação reutilizável; Com argolas; Autoverificação; Frases com palavras de uso frequente; Separadores de ordenação; Guia para professores/pais; Outro
sk-SK: Funkcie zahrnuté vo flash karte: Odpoveď na zadnej strane; Rozšírená realita / sprievodná aplikácia; Vrecúško na prenášanie; Stierateľná fixka; Ilustrácie/obrázky; Sprievodca výslovnosťou; Sledovanie pokroku; QR kód / sprievodný zvuk; Opakovane použiteľný úložný box; Viazané na krúžku; Samokontrola; Vety s bežne používanými slovami; Triediace záložky; Sprievodca pre učiteľa/rodiča; Iné
hu: A flash kártya mellékelt jellemzői: Válasz a hátoldalon; Kiterjesztett valóság / társalkalmazás; Hordtasak; Szárazon törölhető filc; Illusztrációk / képek; Hangtani útmutató; Haladáskövető; QR-kód / audiokiegészítés; Újrafelhasználható tárolódoboz; Gyűrűs fűzésű; Önellenőrző; Gyakori szavakat tartalmazó mondatok; Rendezőlapok; Tanári/szülői útmutató; Egyéb
ko: 플래시 카드에 포함된 기능: 뒷면 정답 표기; 증강 현실/컴패니언 앱; 휴대용 파우치; 화이트보드 마커; 일러스트레이션/그림; 파닉스 가이드; 진행 상태 트래커; QR 코드/오디오 컴패니언; 재사용 가능한 보관함; 링 제본; 자가 확인; 사이트 워드 문장; 분류 탭; 교사/학부모 가이드; 기타
vi: Các tính năng đi kèm thẻ học: Đáp án ở mặt sau; Thực tế tăng cường/ứng dụng đi kèm; Túi đựng; Bút lông bảng trắng; Tranh/ảnh minh họa; Hướng dẫn phát âm; Bảng theo dõi tiến độ; Mã QR/âm thanh đi kèm; Hộp đựng tái sử dụng; Đóng khoen tròn; Tự kiểm tra; Câu chứa từ vựng phổ biến; Tab phân loại; Hướng dẫn cho giáo viên/phụ huynh; Khác
zh-TW: 閃卡隨附功能: 答案在背面; 擴增實境 / 應用程式搭配; 隨身收納袋; 白板筆; 插畫 / 圖片; 發音指南; 進度追蹤器; QR 碼 / 音訊搭配; 可重複使用的收納盒; 線圈裝訂; 自我檢查; 常見字造句; 分類標籤; 教師 / 家長指南; 其他
ru: Функции карточек в комплекте: Ответ на обороте; Дополненная реальность/приложение; Чехол для переноски; Маркер сухого стирания; Иллюстрации/картинки; Руководство по фонетике; Трекер прогресса; QR-код/аудиоприложение; Многоразовая коробка для хранения; На кольце; Самопроверка; Предложения со зрительными словами; Вкладки для сортировки; Руководство для учителя/родителя; Другое
pt-BR: Recursos incluídos nos cartões de memorização: Resposta no verso; Realidade aumentada/aplicativo complementar; Bolsa de transporte; Marcador de quadro branco; Ilustrações/imagens; Guia de fonética; Rastreador de progresso; Código QR/áudio complementar; Caixa de armazenamento reutilizável; Encadernação com argola; Autocorreção; Frases com palavras frequentes; Abas de classificação; Guia para professores/pais; Outros
ja: フラッシュカードに含まれる機能: 裏面に答えあり; AR (拡張現実)/アプリ連携; キャリーポーチ; ホワイトボードマーカー; イラスト/写真; フォニックスガイド; 進捗トラッカー; QRコード/音声連携; 再利用可能な収納ボックス; リング綴じ; 自己採点; サイトワードの文章; 仕分けタブ; 教師/保護者向けガイド; その他
zh-CN: 闪卡包含的功能: 背面附答案; 增强现实/配套 App; 收纳袋; 白板笔; 插画/图片; 自然拼读指南; 进度跟踪器; 二维码/配套音频; 可重复使用的储物盒; 活页装订; 自我检查; 常见词句子; 分类标签; 教师/家长指南; 其他
tr: Bilgi kartının özellikleri: Cevap arkada; Artırılmış gerçeklik/uygulama eşlikli; Taşıma kılıfı; Silinebilir kalem; İllüstrasyonlar/resimler; Ses bilgisi rehberi; İlerleme takipçisi; QR kod/ses eşlikli; Yeniden kullanılabilir saklama kutusu; Halkaya dizili; Kendi kendini kontrol etme; Görme kelimeleri cümleleri; Sıralama sekmeleri; Öğretmen/ebeveyn rehberi; Diğer
th: ฟีเจอร์แฟลชรวมอยู่ด้วย: เฉลยอยู่ด้านหลัง; แอป AR/แอปที่ใช้ร่วมกัน; กระเป๋าใส่การ์ด; ปากกาไวท์บอร์ด; ภาพประกอบ/รูปภาพ; คู่มือออกเสียง; ตัวติดตามความคืบหน้า; คิวอาร์โค้ด/เสียงประกอบ; กล่องเก็บที่ใช้ซ้ำได้; เข้าเล่มแบบห่วง; ตรวจสอบคำตอบด้วยตนเอง; ประโยคคำศัพท์พื้นฐาน; แท็บจัดหมวดหมู่; คู่มือครู/ผู้ปกครอง; อื่นๆ
de: Enthaltene Funktionen der Lernkarten: Antwort auf der Rückseite; Augmented Reality/App-Begleiter; Tragetasche; Trocken abwischbarer Marker; Illustrationen/Bilder; Leseanleitung (Phonetik); Fortschrittstracker; QR-Code/Audio-Begleiter; Wiederverwendbare Aufbewahrungsbox; Ringbindung; Selbstkontrolle; Sichtwort-Sätze; Sortier-Tabs; Lehrer-/Elternhandbuch; Sonstige
pl: Karta Flash zawiera funkcje: Odpowiedź na odwrocie; Rzeczywistość rozszerzona / aplikacja towarzysząca; Etui podróżne; Pisak suchościeralny; Ilustracje/obrazki; Przewodnik po fonetyce; Śledzenie postępów; Kod QR / materiały audio; Pudełko do przechowywania wielokrotnego użytku; Spięte kółkiem; Samokontrola; Zdania z wyrazami do czytania globalnego; Zakładki do sortowania; Przewodnik dla nauczyciela/rodzica; Inne